Hawaii statutes.
[§327-4] Who may make an anatomical
gift before donor's death. Subject to section 327-8, an anatomical gift of
a donor's body or body part may be made during the life of the donor for
transplantation, therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in
section 327-5 by:

(1) The donor, if the donor is at least eighteen
years of age or is under eighteen years of age and is:

(A) An emancipated minor, as deemed pursuant
to section 577-25; or

(B) Authorized under a state law to apply for
a driver's license under part VI of chapter 286;

(2) An agent of the donor, unless the power of
attorney for health care or other record prohibits the agent from making an
anatomical gift;

(3) A parent of the donor, if the donor is under
eighteen years of age and not emancipated; or

(4) The donor's guardian. [L 2008, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next